Utah statutes.
13-26-8.   Penalties.

(1) (a)  Any telephone soliciting business or any person associated with a telephone soliciting business, including solicitors, salespersons, agents, representatives of a solicitor, or independent contractor, who violates this chapter as a first offense is guilty of a class B misdemeanor.

(b)  In the case of a second offense, the person is guilty of a class A misdemeanor.

(c)  In the case of three or more offenses, the person is guilty of a third degree felony.

(d)  In addition to other penalties under this Subsection (1), the division director may issue a cease and desist order and impose an administrative fine of up to $2,500 for each violation of this chapter.  All money received through administrative fines imposed under this section shall be deposited in the Consumer Protection Education and Training Fund created by Section 13-2-8.

(2)  Any telephone soliciting business or any person associated with a telephone soliciting business, including solicitors, salespersons, agents, representatives of a solicitor, or independent contractors, who violates any provision of this chapter shall be subject to a civil penalty in a court of competent jurisdiction not exceeding $2,500 for each unlawful transaction.

